Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1268
Discovery; delivery of copies of documents; refusal to deliver; penalty.

Either party or his attorney, if required, shall deliver to the other party or his attorney, a copy of any deed, instrument or other writing whereon the action or defense is founded, or which he intends to offer in evidence at the trial. If the plaintiff or defendant shall refuse to furnish the copy or copies required, the party so refusing shall not be permitted to give in evidence, at the trial, the original, of which a copy has been refused. This section shall not apply to any paper a copy of which is filed with a pleading.

R.S.1867, Code § 395, p. 459;

R.S.1913, § 7961;

C.S.1922, § 8902;

C.S.1929, § 20-1268;

R.S.1943, § 25-1268.